Utah statutes.
31A-23a-301.   Agency license.
An insurance organization shall be licensed as an agency if the insurance
organization acts as:
(1)  a producer;
(2)  a limited line producer;
(3)  a consultant;
(4)  a managing general agent; or
(5)  a reinsurance intermediary.
